Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 2

Tennessee Residence Commission Act of 2010

4-23-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Residence Commission Act of 2010.”

Acts 2010, ch. 1111, § 2.

4-23-202. Creation — Membership — Chair — Compensation and reimbursement — Policy regarding conflicts of interest.

There is hereby created the Tennessee residence commission, which shall be composed of six (6) voting, ex officio members, as follows: the governor, the first spouse, the commissioner of general services, the state architect, the chair of the Tennessee historical commission and the executive director of the Tennessee state museum, or their respective designees.

The commission membership shall also include four (4) private citizens appointed by the governor to staggered terms of four (4) years. One (1) member shall serve an initial term of one (1) year, one (1) member shall serve an initial term of two (2) years, one (1) member shall serve an initial term of three (3) years, and one (1) member shall serve an initial term of four (4) years. All citizen members shall be voting members of the commission. In appointing private citizens to serve on the Tennessee residence commission, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) such citizen serving on the commission is sixty (60) years of age or older, that at least one (1) such citizen serving on the commission is a member of a racial minority, and that at least one (1) such citizen is a resident of the City of Oak Hill. In addition to all other requirements for membership on the commission, all persons appointed or otherwise named to serve as members of the commission shall be residents of this state.

The governor shall appoint a chair from among the full membership of the commission.

All members shall serve without compensation, but shall be eligible for reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The commission shall adopt and implement a policy related to conflicts of interest, to ensure that all members avoid any situation that creates an actual or perceived conflict of interest related to the work of the commission. Such policy related to conflicts of interest shall be implemented within six (6) months of the final appointment of a member to the commission.

The commission shall adopt and implement a policy of ethical considerations to ensure all members operate in a manner that is free from actual or perceived inappropriate actions. Such policy of ethical considerations shall be implemented within six (6) months of the final appointment of a member to the commission.

Six (6) members of the commission shall constitute a quorum.

Acts 2010, ch. 1111, § 3.

Code Commission Note.

Former subsection (f) concerning the termination of the Tennessee residence commission on June 30, 2012, has been deleted as obsolete by the Code Commission in 2015, due to the extension of the commission.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee residence commission, created by this section, shall terminate effective June 30, 2022. See §§4-29-112,4-29-243.

4-23-203. Powers and duties.

The Tennessee residence commission shall have the following powers and duties:

Formulate and develop a plenary master plan and program for the adaptive restoration and preservation of the Tennessee residence, including the building and contiguous grounds;

Consistent with the master plan required in subdivision (a)(1), establish policies governing any improvements, alterations, repairs, replacements, or reconstruction of the residence, its appurtenant buildings, and its grounds, including furniture and fixtures;

Establish rules and policies governing the acquisition of furniture and fixtures, including, but not limited to, carpets, rugs, paintings, draperies, and objects of art, for the public quarters of the residence;

Establish rules and policies to ensure that the private quarters of the executive residence are maintained appropriately;

Establish rules and policies governing maintenance of the Tennessee residence; and

Establish rules and policies governing the use of the Tennessee residence for any nongovernmental activities.

The commission shall report in writing its progress on the formulation and development of the master plan and program required by subsection (a) to the state building commission, the speaker of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives no later than February 1 of each year, until such master plan and program have been completed.

Acts 2010, ch. 1111, § 4.

4-23-204. Staffing — Contracting for services of experts and specialists.

The department of general services, the state museum, the Tennessee historical society, and the office of the state architect shall provide appropriate staff assistance to the Tennessee residence commission.

In addition, the commission has the authority to contract pursuant to state law for the services of experts and specialists in the area of adaptive restoration and preservation of historic buildings. All contracts shall be executed by the commissioner of finance and administration, with the approval of the comptroller of the treasury and the attorney general and reporter; provided, that design and construction contracts are subject to the approval of the state building commission.

Acts 2010, ch. 1111, § 5.